Hawaii statutes.
§342D-8 Inspection of premises. (a)
The director, in accordance with law, may enter and inspect any building or
place to:

(1) Investigate an actual or suspected source of
water pollution;

(2) Investigate actual or suspected management
practices for domestic sewage, sewage sludge, and recycled water, whether or
not the practices cause water pollution;

(3) Ascertain compliance or noncompliance with this
chapter, any rule or standard adopted by the department pursuant to this
chapter, or any permit or other approval granted by the department pursuant to
this chapter; and

(4) Make reasonable tests in connection therewith.

(b) The director may require any permittee or
holder of a variance or person subject to pretreatment requirements to permit
the director or the director's authorized representative upon the presentation
of the director's or representative's credentials:

(1) To enter upon permittee's or variance holder's
premises or premises of a person subject to pretreatment requirements in which
an effluent source is located or in which any records are required to be kept
under the terms and conditions of the permit or variance or pretreatment
requirements;

(2) To inspect any monitoring equipment or method
required in the permit or variance or by pretreatment requirements; and

(3) To sample any discharge of water pollutants or
effluent.

(c) No confidential information secured
pursuant to this section by any official or employee of the department within
the scope and course of the official's or employee's employment in the
prevention, control, or abatement of water pollution shall be disclosed by the
official or employee except as it relates directly to water pollution and then,
only in connection with the official's or employee's official duties and within
the scope and course of the official's or employee's employment. [L 1989, c
212, pt of §2; am L 1995, c 180, §8; am L 1999, c 193, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next